Montana, session 2025, HB564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Mandatory reporting of deer and elk hunting activity -- bonus point -
- administrative fee -- rulemaking. (1) A person who holds a hunting license for deer or elk shall report to the
department their hunting activity for each animal during the license year.
(2) A person who completes reporting of their hunting activity by February 15 of the license year in
which the person purchased a deer or elk license may choose to receive one bonus point for either a deer or
elk upon completion and submission of the report.
(3) A person who does not complete reporting of their hunting activity prior to the end of the
license year in which the person purchased a deer or elk license will be assessed an administrative fee of no
less than $5 and no more than $50, subject to determination by the department. The fee must be paid prior to
the purchase of or upon purchasing a base hunting license for the coming license year. A hunter may not be
required to pay more than one administrative fee for all reporting violations during a license year.
(4) The validation of an electronic tag pursuant to 87-2-119 does not satisfy the reporting
requirements of this section.
(5) The department shall develop a system for collecting and retaining mandatory hunting activity
reports. The department shall provide physical reporting forms, if applicable for carrying out the provisions of
this section.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 564

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 564.1
(6) The department may make rules to implement this section.
(7) As used in this section, "hunting activity" includes harvest success, hunting district locations,
dates during which hunting occurred, and any other pertinent hunting information as determined by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 87, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective March 1, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 564